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LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DTC P0778/63 Pressure Control Solenoid ”B” Electrical
(Shift Solenoid Valve SL2)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
See page DI−49.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P0778/63

Engine and ECT ECU checks for an open or short circuit in
shift solenoidvalvesSL2(1 −tripdetection logic)
(a) When solenoid is energized, duty ratio exceed 75%
(b) When solenoid is not energized, duty ratio is less than 3%

SOpenorshort inshift solenoidvalveSL2circuit
SShift solenoidvalveSL2
SEngineandECTECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check transmission wire.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the transmission wire connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between SL2

+ 
and SL2

− of transmission
wire.
OK:

Resistance: 5.0 − 5.6 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals SL2

+ 
and SL2

− of the
transmission wire connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M � or higher

NG Go to step 3.

OK

2 Measure resistance between terminal SL2 
+ 

and SL2
− of Engine and ECT ECU

connector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the transmission wire connector.
(b) Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals SL2

+ 
and SL2

− of En-
gine and ECT ECU connector.
OK:

Resistance: 5.0 − 5.6 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals SL2

+ 
and SL2

− of the
Engine and ECT ECU connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M � or higher

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector
(See page IN−38).

OK

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−38).
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3 Check shift solenoid valve SL2.

PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(c) Remove the shift solenoid valve SL2.
CHECK:
(a) Measure the resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of so-

lenoid connector.
Standard: 5.0 − 5.6 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)

(b) Connect the positive (+) lead with an 21 W bulb to terminal
2 of solenoid connector and negative (−) lead to terminal
1 of the solenoid valve connector, then check the move-
ment of the valve.
Standard: Solenoid sounds operation noise.

OK:
Standard

NG Replace the shift solenoid valve SL2
(See page AT−8) .

OK

Repair or replace the transmission wire
(See page AT−6) .


